Massachusetts, session 194th, S484.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 14A of chapter 118E of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following two paragraphs:-
In the event that a nursing facility resident who is a MassHealth recipient enters a
hospital, the division shall pay to preserve his or her bed in the nursing facility for a period of up
to and including 20 days per medical event. The division shall reimburse the nursing facility for
the medical leave of absence, which shall include an observation stay in a hospital in excess of
24 hours.
In the event a MassHealth member is residing in a nursing facility and requests a
nonmedical leave of absence, the division shall pay to preserve his or her bed in the facility for a
of 2

period of up to and including 10 calendar days per year. The division shall reimburse the nursing
facility for the nonmedical leave of absence.
of 2